Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2031.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 403.3. Subsidized Child Care and Notification Requirements.--(a) Notwithstanding 55 Pa. Code § 3042.151(a) (relating to general notification requirements), the eligibility agency shall issue written notification to the parent or caretaker no later than thirty calendar days prior to taking an action that affects the family's eligibility status for subsidized child care or a change in the amount of the family's subsidized child care benefit.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases 12345678910111213141516171819 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Caretaker" means a "caretaker" as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 3042.3 (relating to definitions)."Eligibility agency" means an "eligibility agency" as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 3042.3."Family" means a "family" as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 3042.3."Parent" means a "parent" as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 3042.3."Subsidized child care" means "subsidized child care" as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 3042.3.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2031PN2590 - 2 - 1234567891011